California statutes. Corporations Code
Whenever a domestic or foreign limited partnership or other business entity having any real property in this state merges with another limited partnership or other business entity pursuant to the laws of this state or of the state or place in which any constituent limited partnership or constituent other business entity was organized, and the laws of the state or place of organization, including this state, of any disappearing limited partnership or disappearing other business entity provide substantially that the making and filing of the agreement of merger or certificate of merger vests in the surviving limited partnership or surviving other business entity all the real property of any disappearing limited partnership and disappearing other business entity, the filing for record in the office of the county recorder of any county in this state in which any of the real property of the disappearing limited partnership or disappearing other business entity is located of either of the following shall evidence record ownership in the surviving limited partnership or surviving other business entity of all interest of such disappearing limited partnership or disappearing other business entity in and to the real property located in that county:

(a) A certificate of merger certified by the Secretary of State, or other certificate prescribed by the Secretary of State.

(b) A copy of the agreement of merger or certificate of merger, certified by the Secretary of State or an authorized public official of the state or place pursuant to the laws of which the merger is effected.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15911.19.

Recording of the certificate of merger in accordance with Section 15911.18 shall create, in favor of bona fide purchasers or encumbrancers for value, a conclusive presumption that the merger was validly completed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11.5. Dissenting Limited Partners’ Rights [15911.20. - 15911.33.]

15911.20.

(a) For purposes of this article, “reorganization” refers to any of the following:

(1) A conversion pursuant to Article 11 (commencing with Section 15911.01).

(2) A merger pursuant to Article 11 (commencing with Section 15911.10).

(3) The acquisition by one limited partnership in exchange, in whole or in part, for its partnership interests (or the partnership interests or equity securities of a partnership or other business entity that is in control of the acquiring limited partnership) of partnership interests or equity securities of another limited partnership or other business entity if, immediately after the acquisition, the acquiring limited partnership has control of the other limited partnership or other business entity.

(4) The acquisition by one limited partnership in exchange in whole or in part for its partnership interests (or the partnership interests or equity securities of a partnership or other business entity which is in control of the acquiring limited partnership) or for its debts securities (or debt securities of a limited partnership or other business entity which is in control of the acquiring limited partnership) which are not adequately secured and which have a maturity date in excess of five years after the consummation of the acquisition, or both, of all or substantially all of the assets of another limited partnership or other business entity.

(b) For purposes of this article, “control” means the possession, direct or indirect, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a limited partnership or other business entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15911.21.

(a) If the approval of outstanding limited partnership interests is required for a limited partnership to participate in a reorganization, pursuant to the limited partnership agreement of the partnership, or otherwise, then each limited partner of the limited partnership holding those interests may, by complying with this article, require the limited partnership to purchase for cash, at its fair market value, the interest owned by the limited partner in the limited partnership, if the interest is a dissenting interest as defined in subdivision (b). The fair market value shall be determined as of the day before the first announcement of the terms of the proposed reorganization, excluding any appreciation or depreciation in consequence of the proposed reorganization.

(b) As used in this article, “dissenting interest” means the interest of a limited partner that satisfies all of the following conditions:

(1) Either:

(A) Was not, immediately prior to the reorganization, either (i) listed on any national securities exchange certified by the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation under subdivision (o) of Section 25100, or (ii) listed on the list of OTC margin stocks issued by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, provided that in either instance, the limited partnership whose outstanding interests are so listed provides, in its notice to limited partners requesting their approval of the proposed reorganization, a summary of the provisions of this section and Sections 15911.22, 15911.23, 15911.24, and 15911.25.

(B) If the interest is of a
 class of interests listed as described in clause (i) or (ii) of subparagraph (A), demands for payment are filed with respect to 5 percent or more of the outstanding interests of that class.

(2) Was outstanding on the date for the determination of limited partners entitled to vote on the reorganization.

(3) (A) Was not voted in favor of the reorganization, or (B) if the interest is described in clause (i) or (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1), was voted against the reorganization; provided, however, that subparagraph (A) rather than subparagraph (B) of this paragraph applies in any event where the approval for the proposed reorganization is sought by written consent rather than at a meeting.

(4) The limited partner has demanded that it be purchased by the limited partnership at its fair
 market value in accordance with Section 15911.22.

(5) The limited partner has submitted it for endorsement, if applicable, in accordance with Section 15911.23.

(c) As used in this article, “dissenting limited partner” means the recordholder of a dissenting interest, and includes an assignee of record of such an interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 65.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

15911.22.

(a) If limited partners have a right under Section 15911.21, subject to compliance with paragraphs (4) and (5) of subdivision (b) thereof, to require the limited partnership to purchase their limited partnership interests for cash, such limited partnership shall mail to each such limited partner a notice of the approval of the reorganization by the requisite vote or consent of the limited partners, within 10 days after the date of such approval, accompanied by a copy of this section and Sections 15911.21, 15911.23, 15911.24, and 15911.25, a statement of the price determined by the limited partnership to represent the fair market value of its outstanding interests, and a brief description of the procedure to be followed if the limited partner desires to exercise the limited partner’s rights under such sections. The statement of price constitutes an offer by the limited partnership to purchase at the price stated any dissenting interests as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 15911.21, unless they lose their status as dissenting interests under Section 15911.30.

(b) Any limited partner who has a right to require the limited partnership to purchase the limited partner’s interest for cash under Section 15911.21, subject to compliance with paragraphs (4) and (5) of subdivision (b) thereof, and who desires the limited partnership to purchase such interest, shall make written demand upon the limited partnership for the purchase of such interest and the payment to the limited partner in cash of its fair market value. The demand is not effective for any purpose unless it is received by the limited partnership or any transfer agent thereof (1) in the case of interests described in clause (i) or (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 15911.21, not later than the date of the limited partners’ meeting to vote upon the reorganization, or (2) in any other case, within 30 days after the date on which notice of the approval of the reorganization by the requisite vote or consent of the limited partners is mailed by the limited partnership to the limited partners.

(c) The demand shall state the number or amount of the limited partner’s interest in the limited partnership and shall contain a statement of what such limited partner claims to be the fair market value of that interest on the day before the announcement of the proposed reorganization. The statement of fair market value constitutes an offer by the limited partner to sell the interest at such price.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15911.23.

Within 30 days after the date on which notice of the approval of the outstanding interests of the limited partnership is mailed to the limited partner pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 15911.22, the limited partner shall submit to the limited partnership at its principal office or at the office of any transfer agent thereof, (a) if the interest is evidenced by a certificate, the limited partner’s certificate representing the interest which the limited partner demands that the limited partnership purchase, to be stamped or endorsed with a statement that the interest is a dissenting interest or to be exchanged for certificates of appropriate denominations so stamped or endorsed, or (b) if the interest is not evidenced by a certificate, written notice of the number or amount of interest which the limited partner demands that the limited partnership purchase. Upon subsequent transfers of the dissenting interest on the books of the limited partnership, the new certificates or other written statement issued therefor shall bear a like statement, together with the name of the original holder of the dissenting interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15911.24.

(a) If the limited partnership and the dissenting limited partner agree that such limited partner’s interest is a dissenting interest and agree upon the price to be paid for the dissenting interest, the dissenting limited partner is entitled to the agreed price with interest thereon at the legal rate on judgments from the date of consummation of the reorganization. All agreements fixing the fair market value of any dissenting limited partner’s interest as between the limited partnership and such limited partner shall be in writing and filed in the records of the limited partnership.

(b) Subject to the provisions of Section 15911.27, payment of the fair market value for a dissenting interest shall be made within 30 days after the amount thereof has been agreed to or within 30 days after any statutory or contractual conditions to the reorganization are satisfied, whichever is later, and in the case of dissenting interests evidenced by certificates of interest, subject to surrender of such certificates of interest, unless provided otherwise by agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15911.25.

(a) If the limited partnership denies that a limited partnership interest is a dissenting interest, or the limited partnership and a dissenting limited partner fail to agree upon the fair market value of a dissenting interest, then such limited partner or any interested limited partnership, within six months after the date on which notice of the approval of the reorganization by the requisite vote or consent of the limited partners was mailed to the limited partner, but not thereafter, may file a complaint in the superior court of the proper county praying the court to determine whether the interest is a dissenting interest, or the fair market value of the dissenting interest, or both, or may intervene in any action pending on such a complaint.

(b) Two or more dissenting limited partners may join as plaintiffs or be joined as defendants in any such action and two or more such actions may be consolidated.

(c) On the trial of the action, the court shall determine the issues. If the status of the limited partnership interest as a dissenting interest is in issue, the court shall first determine that issue. If the fair market value of the dissenting interest is in issue, the court shall determine, or shall appoint one or more impartial appraisers to determine, the fair market value of the dissenting interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15911.26.

(a) If the court appoints an appraiser or appraisers, they shall proceed forthwith to determine the fair market value per interest of the outstanding limited partnership interests of the limited partnership, by class if necessary. Within the time fixed by the court, the appraisers, or a majority of them, shall make and file a report in the office of the clerk of the court. Thereupon, on the motion of any party, the report shall be submitted to the court and considered on any additional evidence as the court considers relevant. If the court finds the report reasonable, the court may confirm it.

(b) If a majority of the appraisers appointed fails to make and file a report within 30 days from the date of their appointment, or within any further time as may be allowed by the court, or the report is not confirmed by the court, the court shall determine the fair market value per interest of the outstanding limited partnership interests of the limited partnership, by class if necessary.

(c) Subject to Section 15911.27, judgment shall be rendered against the limited partnership for payment of an amount equal to the fair market value, as determined by the court, of each dissenting interest which any dissenting limited partner who is a party, or has intervened, is entitled to require the limited partnership to purchase, with interest thereon at the legal rate on judgments from the date of consummation of the reorganization.

(d) Any judgment shall be payable forthwith, provided, however, that with respect to limited partnership interests evidenced by transferable certificates of interest, only upon the endorsement and delivery to the limited partnership of those certificates representing the interests described in the judgment. Any party may appeal from the judgment.

(e) The costs of the action, including reasonable compensation for the appraisers, to be fixed by the court, shall be assessed or apportioned as the court considers equitable, but, if the appraisal exceeds the price offered by the limited partnership, the limited partnership shall pay the costs (including, in the discretion of the court, if the value awarded by the court for the dissenting interest is more than 125 percent of the price offered by the limited partnership under subdivision (a) of Section 15911.22, attorney’s fees and fees of expert witnesses).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 46.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

15911.27.

To the extent that the payment to dissenting limited partners of the fair market value of their dissenting interests would require the dissenting limited partners to return such payment or a portion thereof by reason of Section 15905.09 or the Uniform Voidable Transactions Act (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 3439) of Title 2 of Part 2 of Division 4 of the Civil Code), then that payment or portion thereof shall not be made and the dissenting limited partners shall become creditors of the limited partnership for the amount not paid, together with interest thereon at the legal rate on judgments until the date of payment, but subordinate to all other creditors in any proceeding relating to the winding up and dissolution of the limited partnership, such debt to be payable when
 permissible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 44, Sec. 22.   (SB 161)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

15911.28.

Any cash distributions made by a limited partnership to a dissenting limited partner after the date of consummation of the reorganization, but prior to any payment by the limited partnership for such dissenting limited partner’s interest, shall be credited against the total amount to be paid by the limited partnership for such dissenting interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15911.29.

Except as expressly limited by this article, dissenting limited partners shall continue to have all the rights and privileges incident to their interests immediately prior to the reorganization, including limited liability, until payment by the limited partnership for their dissenting interests. A dissenting limited partner may not withdraw a demand for payment unless the limited partnership consents thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15911.30.

A dissenting interest loses its status as a dissenting interest and the holder thereof ceases to be a dissenting limited partner and ceases to be entitled to require the limited partnership to purchase the interest upon the happening of any of the following:

(a) The limited partnership abandons the reorganization. Upon abandonment of the reorganization, the limited partnership shall pay, on demand, to any dissenting limited partner who has initiated proceeding in good faith under this article, all reasonable expenses incurred in such proceedings and reasonable attorneys’ fees.

(b) The interest is transferred prior to its submission for endorsement in accordance with Section 15911.23.

(c) The dissenting limited partner and the limited partnership do not agree upon the status of the interest as a dissenting interest or upon the purchase price of the dissenting interest, and neither files a complaint nor intervenes in a pending action, as provided in Section 15911.25, within six months after the date upon which notice of the approval of the reorganization by the requisite vote or consent of limited partners was mailed to the limited partner.

(d) The dissenting limited partner, with the consent of the limited partnership, withdraws such limited partner’s demand for purchase of the dissenting interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15911.31.

If litigation is instituted to test the sufficient or regularity of the vote or consent of the limited partners in authorizing a reorganization, any proceedings under Sections 15911.25 and 15911.26 shall be suspended until final determination of that litigation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15911.32.

(a) This article applies to the following:

(1) A domestic limited partnership formed on or after January 1, 1991.

(2) A foreign limited partnership if (A) the foreign limited partnership was formed on or after January 1, 1991, or filed an application to qualify to do business on or after January 1, 1991, and (B) limited partners holding more than 50 percent of the voting power held by all limited partners of the foreign limited partnership reside in this state.

(3) A limited partnership if the partnership agreement so provides or if all general partners and a majority in interest of the limited partners determine that this article shall apply.

(b) This article does not apply to limited partnership interests governed by limited partnership agreements whose terms and provisions specifically set forth the amount to be paid in respect of such interests in the event of a reorganization of the limited partnership, or to limited partnerships with 35 or fewer limited partners, unless the partnership agreement provides that this article shall apply or unless all general partners and a majority in interest of the limited partners agree that this article shall apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15911.33.

(a) No limited partner of a limited partnership who has a right under this article to demand payment of cash for the interest owned by such limited partner in a limited partnership shall have any right at law or in equity to attack the validity of the reorganization, or to have the reorganization set aside or rescinded, except in an action to test whether the vote or consent of limited partners required to authorize or approve the reorganization has been obtained in accordance with the procedures established therefor by the partnership agreement of the limited partnership.

(b) If one of the parties to a reorganization is directly or indirectly controlled by, or under common control with, another party to the reorganization, subdivision (a) shall not apply to any limited partner of such controlled party who has not demanded payment of cash for such limited partner’s interest pursuant to this article; but if such limited partner institutes any action to attack the validity of the reorganization or to have the reorganization set aside or rescinded, the limited partner shall not thereafter have any right to demand payment of cash for such limited partner’s interest pursuant to this article.

(c) If one of the parties to a reorganization is directly or indirectly controlled by, or under common control with, another party to the reorganization, then, in any action to attack the validity of the reorganization or to have the reorganization set aside or rescinded, (1) a party to a reorganization which controls another party to a reorganization shall have the burden of proving that the transaction is just and reasonable as to the limited partners of the controlled party, and (2) a person who controls two or more parties to a reorganization shall have the burden of proving that the transaction is just and reasonable as to the limited partners of any party so controlled.

(d) Subdivisions (b) and (c) shall not apply if a majority in interest of the limited partners other than limited partners who are directly or indirectly controlled by, or under common control with, another party to the reorganization approve or consent to the reorganization.

(e) This section shall not prevent a partner of a limited partnership that is a party to a reorganization from bringing an action against a general partner of the limited partnership, the limited partnership, or any person controlling a general partner at law or in equity as to any matters (including, without limitation, an action for breach of fiduciary obligation or fraud) other than to attack the validity of the reorganization or to have the reorganization set aside or rescinded.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Miscellaneous Provisions [15912.01. - 15912.07.]

15912.01.

In applying and construing this chapter, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15912.02.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end, the provisions of this chapter are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15912.03.

This chapter modifies, limits, or supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7001 et seq., but this chapter does not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of that act or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section 103(b) of that act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15912.04.

This chapter shall become operative on January 1, 2008.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Note: This section prescribes a delayed operative date for Chapter 5.5 (later renumbered as Chapter 4.5), comprising Sections 15900 to 15912.07.)
-------------------------------------------

15912.06.

(a) Before January 1, 2010, this chapter governs only:

(1) a limited partnership formed on or after January 1, 2008; and

(2) except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (c) and (d), a limited partnership formed before January 1, 2008, which elects, in the manner provided in its partnership agreement or by law for amending the partnership agreement, to be subject to this chapter.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), on and after January 1, 2010, this chapter governs all limited partnerships.

(c) With respect to a limited partnership formed before January 1, 2008, the following rules apply except as the partners otherwise elect in the manner provided in the partnership agreement or by law for amending the partnership agreement:

(1) Section 15901.04(c) does not apply and the limited partnership has whatever duration it had under the law applicable immediately before January 1, 2008.

(2) Sections 15906.01 and 15906.02 do not apply and a limited partner has the same right and power to dissociate from the limited partnership, with the same consequences, as existed immediately before January 1, 2008.

(3) Subdivision (d) of Section 15906.03 does not apply.

(4) Subdivision (e) of Section 15906.03 does not apply and a court has the same power to expel a general partner as the court had immediately before January 1, 2008.

(5) Subdivision (c) of Section 15908.01 does not apply and the connection between a person’s dissociation as a general partner and the dissolution of the limited partnership is the same as existed immediately before January 1, 2008.

(d) With respect to a limited partnership that elects pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) to be subject to this chapter, after the election takes effect, the provisions of this chapter relating to the liability of the limited partnership’s general partners to third parties apply:

(1) before January 1, 2010, to:

(A) a third party that had not done business with the limited partnership in the year before the election took effect; and

(B) a third party that had done business with the limited partnership in the year before the election took effect only if the third party knows or has received a notification of the election; and

(2) on and after January 1, 2010, to all third parties, but those provisions remain inapplicable to any obligation incurred while those provisions were inapplicable under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1).

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15912.07.

This chapter does not affect an action commenced, proceeding brought, or right accrued before this chapter becomes operative.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Uniform Partnership Act of 1994 [16100. - 16962.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [16100. - 16114.]

16100.

This chapter may be cited as the Uniform Partnership Act of 1994.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16101.

(a) As used in this chapter, the following terms and phrases have the following meanings:

(1) “Business” includes every trade, occupation, and profession.

(2) “Debtor in bankruptcy” means a person who is the subject of either of the following:

(A) An order for relief under Title 11 of the United States Code or a comparable order under a successor statute of general application.

(B) A comparable order under federal, state, or foreign law governing insolvency.

(3) “Distribution” means a transfer of money or other property from a partnership to a partner in the partner’s capacity as a partner or to the partner’s transferee.

(4) “Electronic transmission by the partnership” means a communication (a) delivered by (1) facsimile telecommunication or electronic mail when directed to the facsimile number or electronic mail address, respectively, for that recipient on record with the partnership, (2) posting on an electronic message board or network that the partnership has designated for those communications, together with a separate notice to the recipient of the posting, which transmission shall be validly delivered upon the later of the posting or delivery of the separate notice thereof, or (3) other means of electronic communication, (b) to a recipient who has provided an unrevoked consent
 to the use of those means of transmission, and (c) that creates a record that is capable of retention, retrieval, and review, and that may thereafter be rendered into clearly legible tangible form. However, an electronic transmission by a partnership to an individual partner is not authorized unless, in addition to satisfying the requirements of this section, the transmission satisfies the requirements applicable to
 consumer consent to electronic records as set forth in the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001(c)(1)).

(5) “Electronic transmission to the partnership” means a communication (a) delivered by (1) facsimile telecommunication or electronic mail when directed to the facsimile number or electronic mail address, respectively, which the partnership has provided from time to time to partners for sending communications to the partnership, (2) posting on an electronic message board or network that the partnership has designated for those communications, and which transmission shall be validly delivered upon the posting, or (3) other means of electronic communication, (b) as to which the partnership has placed in effect reasonable measures to verify that the sender is the partner, in person or
 by proxy, purporting to send the transmission, and (c) that creates a record that is capable of retention, retrieval, and review, and that may thereafter be rendered into clearly legible tangible form.

(6) (A) “Foreign limited liability partnership” means a partnership, other than a limited partnership, formed pursuant to an agreement governed by the laws of another jurisdiction and denominated or registered as a limited liability partnership or registered limited liability partnership under the laws of that jurisdiction (i) in which each partner is a licensed person or a person licensed or authorized to provide professional limited liability partnership services in a jurisdiction or jurisdictions other than this state, (ii) which is licensed under the laws of the state to engage in the practice of architecture, the
 practice of public accountancy, the practice of engineering, the practice of land surveying, or the practice of law, or (iii) which (I) is related to a registered limited liability partnership that practices public accountancy or, to the extent permitted by the State Bar of California, practices law or is related to a foreign limited liability partnership and (II) provides services related or complementary to the professional limited liability partnership services provided by, or provides services or facilities to, that registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership.

(B) For the purposes of clause (iii) of subparagraph (A), a partnership is related to a registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership if (i) at least a majority of the partners in one partnership are also
 partners in the other partnership, or (ii) at least a majority in interest in each partnership hold interests in or are members of another person, except an individual, and each partnership renders services pursuant to an agreement with that other person, or (iii) one partnership, directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with, the other partnership.

(7) “Licensed person” means any person who is duly licensed, authorized, or registered under the provisions of the Business and Professions Code to provide professional limited liability partnership services or who is lawfully able to render professional limited liability partnership services in this state.

(8) (A) “Registered limited
 liability partnership” means a partnership, other than a limited partnership, formed pursuant to an agreement governed by Article 10 (commencing with Section 16951), that is registered under Section 16953 and (i) each of the partners of which is a licensed person or a person licensed or authorized to provide professional limited liability partnership
 services in a jurisdiction or jurisdictions other than this state, (ii) is licensed under the laws of the state to engage in the practice of architecture, the practice of public accountancy, the practice of engineering, the practice of land surveying, or the practice of law, or (iii)(I) is related to a registered limited liability partnership that practices public accountancy or, to the extent permitted by the State Bar of California, practices law or is related to a foreign limited liability partnership and (II) provides services related or complementary to the professional limited liability partnership services provided by, or provides services or facilities to, that registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership.

(B) For the purposes of clause (iii) of subparagraph (A), a partnership is related
 to a registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership if (i) at least a majority of the partners in one partnership are also partners in the other partnership, or (ii) at least a majority in interest in each partnership hold interests in or are members of another person, other than an individual, and each partnership renders services pursuant to an agreement with that other person, or (iii) one partnership, directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with, the other partnership.

(9) “Partnership” means an association of two or more persons to carry on as coowners a business for profit formed under Section 16202, predecessor law, or comparable law of another jurisdiction, and includes, for all purposes of the laws of this state, a registered limited
 liability partnership, and excludes any partnership formed under Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 15900).

(10) “Partnership agreement” means the agreement, whether written, oral, or implied, among the partners concerning the partnership, including amendments to the partnership agreement.

(11) “Partnership at will” means a partnership in which the partners have not agreed to remain partners until the expiration of a definite term or the completion of a particular undertaking.

(12) “Partnership interest” or “partner’s interest in the partnership” means all of a partner’s interests in the partnership, including the partner’s transferable interest and all management and other rights.

(13) “Person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(14) “Professional limited liability partnership services” means the practice of architecture, the practice of public accountancy, the practice of engineering, the practice of land surveying, or the practice of law.

(15) “Property” means all property, real, personal, or mixed, tangible or intangible, or any interest therein.

(16) “State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the
 Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

(17) “Statement” means a statement of partnership authority under Section 16303, a statement of denial under Section 16304, a statement of dissociation under Section 16704, a statement of dissolution under Section 16805, a statement of conversion or a certificate of conversion under Section 16906, a statement of merger under Section 16915, or an amendment or cancellation of any of the foregoing.

(18) “Transfer” includes an assignment, conveyance, lease, mortgage, deed, and encumbrance.

(b) The inclusion of the practice of architecture as a professional limited liability partnership service permitted by this
 section shall extend only until January 1, 2034.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2034, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 33) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 361, Sec. 9.   (AB 1862)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 10 Stats. 2024, Ch. 361.)
-------------------------------------------

16101.

(a) As used in this chapter, the following terms and phrases have the following meanings:

(1) “Business” includes every trade, occupation, and profession.

(2) “Debtor in bankruptcy” means a person who is the subject of either of the following:

(A) An order for relief under Title 11 of the United States Code or a comparable order under a successor statute of general application.
